Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202684-1502
Board; chairperson; secretary; election; meetings; compensation; expenses.

(1) Within thirty days after its appointment, the Public Employees Retirement Board shall meet and select a chairperson and secretary. Thereafter, the chairperson and the secretary shall be elected in January of each year.

(2) The board shall meet upon call of the chairperson, upon the call of the vice-chairperson, or upon the request of three members of the board filed with the board office. Meetings of the board shall be held in this state and may be held by telecommunication equipment if the requirements of the Open Meetings Act are met.

(3) The members of the board, except the state investment officer, shall be paid seventy-five dollars per diem for attendance at any meeting of the board or for any travel to or from any meeting of the board if such travel occurs on a different day than a board meeting. All members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties as board members, including mileage, as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 39;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 41;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB33, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 136;

Laws 2025, LB295, § 23.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.